Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-524
Objections; contents; hearing.

Such objection shall be limited to a denial of the statements in the petition. It shall be heard by the Chief Water Officer without unnecessary delay.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 7(6), p. 530;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 159.